South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4263.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 63, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-63-755. (A) A school district or open-enrollment charter school may not serve or authorize serving to a student any food that contains the following substances: (1) Blue dye 1 (CAS 3844-45-9); (2) Blue dye 2 (CAS 860-22-0); (3) Green dye 3 (CAS 2353-45-9); (4) Red dye 40 (CAS 25956-17-6); (5) Yellow dye 5 (CAS 1934-21-0); or (6) Yellow dye 6 (CAS 2783-94-0). (B) The provisions of subsection (A) apply to food: (1) acquired for meals and snacks by contract entered into or renewed after June 30, 2025; and (2) brought by students, teachers, or others to be shared among students for any reason, including parties, special celebrations, or cultural events, with the authorization of the teacher or an administrator of the school or district. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----